Hawaii statutes.
[§132D-15] Notice requirements. Each
licensed retail outlet shall post adequate notice that clearly cautions each
person purchasing fireworks of the prohibitions, liabilities, and penalties
incorporated in sections 132D-12, 132D-13, and 132D-14. [L 1994, c 180, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next